fi: Yhteensopiva ohjaustehostinjärjestelmä: Molemmat / yleinen; Sähköhydraulinen ohjaustehostin (EHPS); Hydraulinen ohjaustehostin; Muu
ko: 호환 파워 스티어링 시스템: 모두/범용; 전기 유압식 파워 스티어링(EHPS); 유압식 파워 스티어링; 기타
tr: Uyumlu hidrolik direksiyon sistemi: Her ikisi/evrensel; Elektrohidrolik direksiyon sistemi (EHPS); Hidrolik direksiyon sistemi; Diğer
de: Kompatibles Servolenksystem: Beide/Universal; Elektrohydraulische Servolenkung (EHPS); Hydraulische Servolenkung; Sonstige
zh-CN: 适用动力转向系统: 两者/通用; 电子液压助力转向 (EHPS); 液压助力转向; 其他
ro-RO: Sistem de direcție asistată compatibil: Ambele/universal; Servodirecție electro-hidraulică (EHPS); Servodirecție hidraulică; Altele
ru: Совместимая система гидроусилителя руля: Оба / универсальная; Электрогидравлический усилитель руля (ЭГУР); Гидроусилитель руля; Другое
ja: 対応パワーステアリングシステム: 両方/ユニバーサル; 電動油圧式パワーステアリング (EHPS); 油圧式パワーステアリング; その他
cs: Kompatibilní systém posilovače řízení: Obojí/univerzální; Elektrohydraulický posilovač řízení (EHPS); Hydraulický posilovač řízení; Jiné
pt-BR: Sistema de direção hidráulica compatível: Ambos/universal; Direção eletro-hidráulica (EHPS); Direção hidráulica; Outro
nb: Kompatibelt servostyringssystem: Begge/universell; Elektrohydraulisk servostyring (EHPS); Hydraulisk servostyring; Annet
th: ระบบพวงมาลัยเพาเวอร์ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ทั้งคู่/อเนกประสงค์; พวงมาลัยเพาเวอร์ไฮดรอลิกไฟฟ้า (EHPS); พวงมาลัยเพาเวอร์ไฮดรอลิก; อื่นๆ
nl: Compatibel stuurbekrachtigingssysteem: Beide/universeel; Elektrohydraulische stuurbekrachtiging (EHPS); Hydraulische stuurbekrachtiging; Overig
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém posilňovača riadenia: Oboje/univerzálne; Elektrohydraulický posilňovač riadenia (EHPS); Hydraulický posilňovač riadenia; Iné
es: Sistema de dirección asistida compatible: Ambos/universal; Dirección asistida electrohidráulica (EHPS); Dirección asistida hidráulica; Otro
sl-SI: Združljiv servo volanski sistem: Oboje/univerzalno; Elektro-hidravlični servovolan (EHPS); Hidravlični servovolan; Drugo
pt-PT: Sistema de direção assistida compatível: Ambos/universal; Direção assistida eletro-hidráulica (EHPS); Direção assistida hidráulica; Outro
zh-TW: 相容動力方向盤系統: 兩者皆可/通用; 電子液壓動力方向盤 (EHPS); 液壓動力方向盤; 其他
fr: Système de direction assistée compatible: Les deux/universel; Direction assistée électro-hydraulique (EHPS); Direction assistée hydraulique; Autre
pl: Zgodny układ wspomagania kierownicy: Oba / uniwersalne; Elektrohydrauliczne wspomaganie kierownicy (EHPS); Hydrauliczne wspomaganie kierownicy; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместимост с кормилната система: И двете/универсална; Електрохидравлично кормилно управление (EHPS); Хидравлично кормилно управление; Друго
el: Συμβατό σύστημα συστήματος διεύθυνσης: Και τα δύο/γενικής χρήσης; Ηλεκτροϋδραυλικό σύστημα διεύθυνσης (EHPS); Υδραυλικό σύστημα διεύθυνσης; Άλλο
hu: Kompatibilis szervokormány-rendszer: Mindkettő/univerzális; Elektrohidraulikus szervokormány (EHPS); Hidraulikus szervokormány; Egyéb
vi: Hệ thống trợ lực lái tương thích: Cả hai/phổ thông; Trợ lực lái điện - thủy lực (EHPS); Trợ lực lái thủy lực; Khác
da: Kompatibelt servostyringssystem: Begge/universel; Elektrohydraulisk servostyring (EHPS); Hydraulisk servostyring; Andet
sv: Kompatibelt servostyrningssystem: Båda/universell; Elektrohydraulisk servostyrning (EHPS); Hydraulisk servostyrning; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilan sustav servo upravljanja: Oboje/univerzalno; Elektrohidraulički servo upravljač (EHPS); Hidraulički servo upravljač; Ostalo
it: Sistema servosterzo compatibile: Entrambi/universale; Servosterzo elettroidraulico (EHPS); Servosterzo idraulico; Altro
en: Compatible power steering system: Both/universal; Electro-hydraulic power steering (EHPS); Hydraulic power steering; Other
lt-LT: Suderinama vairo stiprintuvo sistema: Abu / universalus; Elektrohidraulinis vairo stiprintuvas (EHPS); Hidraulinis vairo stiprintuvas; Kita